Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-604
Criminal possession of a forged instrument; penalty; aggregation allowed; when.

(1) Whoever, with knowledge that it is forged and with intent to deceive or harm, possesses any forged instrument covered by section 28-602 or 28-603 commits criminal possession of a forged instrument.

(2) Criminal possession of a forged instrument prohibited by section 28-602 is a Class IV felony.

(3) Criminal possession of a forged instrument prohibited by section 28-603, the amount or value of which is five thousand dollars or more, is a Class IV felony.

(4) Criminal possession of a forged instrument prohibited by section 28-603, the amount or value of which is one thousand five hundred dollars or more but less than five thousand dollars, is a Class I misdemeanor.

(5) Criminal possession of a forged instrument prohibited by section 28-603, the amount or value of which is five hundred dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars, is a Class II misdemeanor.

(6) Criminal possession of a forged instrument prohibited by section 28-603, the amount or value of which is less than five hundred dollars, is a Class III misdemeanor.

(7) For the purpose of determining the class of penalty for criminal possession of a forged instrument prohibited by section 28-603, the amounts or values of more than one such forged instrument may be aggregated in the indictment or information if such forged instruments were part of the same scheme or course of conduct which took place within a sixty-day period and within one county. Such amounts or values shall not be aggregated into more than one offense.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 126;

Laws 2003, LB 17, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB155, § 14;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 33.

Where the evidence offered no rational basis for convicting defendant of what he claimed to be the "lesser-included" offense of criminal possession of forged instrument, trial court did not err in refusing requested instruction. State v. Ebert, 212 Neb. 629, 324 N.W.2d 812 (1982).